New Mexico, session 2026, SB214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 66-8-7 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 505, as amended) is amended to read: "66-8-7. PENALTY FOR MISDEMEANOR.-- A. It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any provision of the Motor Vehicle Code unless the violation is declared a felony. B. Unless another penalty is specified in the Motor Vehicle Code, every person convicted of a misdemeanor for violation of any provision of the Motor Vehicle Code shall be punished by a fine of not [more than three hundred dollars ($300)] less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or both." SECTION 2. Section 66-8-113 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 521, as amended) is amended to read: "66-8-113. RECKLESS DRIVING.-- A. Any person who drives any vehicle carelessly and heedlessly in willful or wanton disregard of the rights or safety of others and without due caution and circumspection and at a speed or in a manner so as to endanger or be likely to endanger any person or property is guilty of reckless driving. B. Every person convicted of reckless driving shall be punished [notwithstanding the provisions of Section 31-18-13 NMSA 1978] upon a first conviction by imprisonment for not less than five days [nor] or more than ninety days or by a fine of not less than [twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor] five hundred dollars ($500) or more than [one hundred dollars ($100)] seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), or both, and on a second or subsequent conviction by imprisonment for not less than ten days [nor] or more than six months or by a fine of not less than [fifty dollars ($50.00) nor] seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both. C. Upon conviction of violation of this section, the director may suspend the license or permit to drive and any nonresident operating privilege for not to exceed ninety days." SECTION 3. Section 66-8-114 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1969, Chapter 169, Section 12) is amended to read: "66-8-114. CARELESS DRIVING.-- A. Any person operating a vehicle on the highway shall give [his] the person's full time and entire attention to the operation of the vehicle. B. Any person who operates a vehicle in a careless, inattentive or imprudent manner without due regard for the width, grade, curves, corners, traffic, weather and road conditions and all other attendant circumstances is guilty of [a misdemeanor] careless driving. C. Every person convicted of careless driving shall be punished upon a first conviction by imprisonment of not more than ninety days or by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both, and on a second or subsequent conviction by imprisonment of not more than six months or by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), or both." SECTION 4. Section 66-8-116 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1978, Chapter 35, Section 524, as amended) is amended to read: "66-8-116. PENALTY ASSESSMENT MISDEMEANORS--DEFINITION--SCHEDULE OF ASSESSMENTS.-- A. As used in the Motor Vehicle Code and the Boat Act, "penalty assessment misdemeanor" means violation of any of the following listed sections of the NMSA 1978 for which, except as provided in Subsections D through F of this section, the listed penalty assessment is established: COMMON NAME OF OFFENSE     SECTION VIOLATED      PENALTY ASSESSMENT Vehicles subject to registration               66-3-1             $ [50.00] 125.00 Improper display of registration plate         66-3-18              [25.00] 100.00 Failure to notify of change of name or address  66-3-23              [25.00] 100.00 Lost or damaged registration, plate or title             66-3-24              [25.00] 100.00 Horseless carriage registration               66-3-27              [25.00] 100.00 Transfer of registration and title                  66-3-103             [25.00] 100.00 Expiration of dealer plates                     66-3-403             [25.00] 100.00 Special registration plates                     66-3-409, 66-3-412.1, 66-3-413, 66-3-415, 66-3-417, 66-3-419, 66-3-421, 66-3-422, 66-3-424.4, 66-3-424.5, 66-3-424.7, 66-3-424.9, 66-3-424.13, 66-3-424.16 and 66-3-424.28      [75.00] 150.00 Bicycle laws               66-3-701 through 66-3-707             [50.00] 125.00 No license display         66-5-16              [25.00] 100.00 Failure to change address or name on license                    66-5-22              [25.00] 100.00 Permitting unauthorized minor to drive             66-5-40              [50.00] 125.00 Permitting unauthorized person to drive            66-5-41              [25.00] 100.00 Failure to obey sign       66-7-104             [25.00] 100.00 Failure to obey signal     66-7-105             [25.00] 100.00 Pedestrian signs and signals                    66-7-106 through 66-7-108             [25.00] 100.00 Speeding                   66-7-301 (1) up to and including ten miles an hour over the speed limit                        [25.00] 100.00 (2) from eleven up to and including fifteen miles an hour over the speed limit                        [30.00] 105.00 (3) from sixteen up to and including twenty miles an hour over the speed limit                                 [65.00] 140.00 (4) from twenty-one up to and including twenty-five miles an hour over the speed limit                       [100.00] 175.00 (5) from twenty-six up to and including thirty miles an hour over the speed limit                                [125.00] 200.00 (6) from thirty-one up to and including thirty-five miles an hour over the speed limit                                [150.00] 225.00 (7) more than thirty-five miles an hour over the speed limit                                [200.00] 275.00 Unfastened safety belt     66-7-372             [25.00] 100.00 Child not in restraint device or seat belt              66-7-369             [25.00] 100.00 Minimum speed              66-7-305             [25.00] 100.00 Speeding                   66-7-306             [25.00] 100.00 Improper starting          66-7-324             [25.00] 100.00 Improper backing           66-7-354             [25.00] 100.00 Improper lane              66-7-308             [25.00] 100.00 Improper lane              66-7-313             [25.00] 100.00 Improper lane              66-7-316             [25.00] 100.00 Improper lane              66-7-317             [25.00] 100.00 Improper lane              66-7-319             [25.00] 100.00 Improper passing           66-7-309 through 66-7-312             [25.00] 100.00 Improper passing           66-7-315             [25.00] 100.00 Controlled access violation                  66-7-320             [25.00] 100.00 Controlled access violation                  66-7-321             [25.00] 100.00 Improper turning           66-7-322             [25.00] 100.00 Improper turning           66-7-323             [25.00] 100.00 Improper turning           66-7-325             [25.00] 100.00 Following too closely      66-7-318             [25.00] 100.00 Failure to yield           66-7-328 through 66-7-331             [25.00] 100.00 Failure to yield           66-7-332             [50.00] 125.00 Failure to yield           66-7-332.1           [25.00] 100.00 Pedestrian violation       66-7-333 through 66-7-340             [25.00] 100.00 Failure to stop            66-7-342 and 66-7-344 through 66-7-346             [25.00] 100.00 Railroad-highway grade crossing violation         66-7-341 and 66-7-343        [150.00] 225.00 Passing school bus         66-7-347            [100.00] 175.00 Failure to signal          66-7-325 through 66-7-327             [25.00] 100.00 Riding on motorcycles      66-7-355            [100.00] 175.00 Video screens in automobiles                66-7-358             [25.00] 100.00 Driving on mountain highways                   66-7-359             [25.00] 100.00 Coasting prohibited        66-7-360             [25.00] 100.00 Animals on highway at night                      66-7-363             [50.00] 125.00 Failure to secure load     66-7-407            [100.00] 175.00 Operation without oversize- overweight permit          66-7-413             [50.00] 250.00 Transport of reducible load with special permit more than six miles from a border crossing     66-7-413            [100.00] 250.00 Driving while license administratively suspended                  66-5-39.2            [25.00] 100.00 Improper equipment      66-3-801 through 66-3-840 and 66-3-842 through 66-3-851             [50.00] 125.00 Improper equipment         66-3-901             [50.00] 125.00 Improper emergency signal                     66-3-853 through 66-3-857             [25.00] 100.00 Minor on motorcycle without helmet             66-7-356            [300.00] 375.00 Operation interference     66-7-357             [50.00] 125.00 Littering                  66-7-364            [300.00] 375.00 Improper parking           66-7-349 through 66-7-352 and 66-7-353         [25.00] 100.00 Improper parking           66-3-852             [25.00] 100.00 Riding in or towing occupied house trailer     66-7-366             [25.00] 100.00 Improper opening of doors  66-7-367             [25.00] 100.00 No slow-moving vehicle emblem or flashing amber light                66-3-887             [25.00] 100.00 Open container-first violation                  66-8-138             [25.00] 300.00 Texting while driving- (1) first violation        66-7-374             [25.00] 100.00 (2) second and subsequent violation                                       [50.00] 125.00 Using a handheld mobile communication device while driving a commercial motor vehicle   66-7-375 (1) first violation                             [25.00] 250.00 (2) second and subsequent violation                                       [50.00] 300.00 Improper use of travel lane 66-7-376           [250.00] 325.00. B. The term "penalty assessment misdemeanor" does not include a violation that has caused or contributed to the cause of an accident resulting in injury or death to a person. C. When an alleged violator of a penalty assessment misdemeanor elects to accept a notice to appear in lieu of a notice of penalty assessment, a fine imposed upon later conviction shall not exceed the penalty assessment established for the particular penalty assessment misdemeanor and probation imposed upon a suspended or deferred sentence shall not exceed ninety days. D. The penalty assessment for speeding in violation of Paragraph (5) of Subsection A of Section 66-7-301 NMSA 1978 is twice the penalty assessment established in Subsection A of this section for the equivalent miles per hour over the speed limit. E. Upon a second conviction for operation without a permit for excessive size or weight pursuant to Section 66-7-413 NMSA 1978, the penalty assessment shall be [two hundred fifty dollars ($250)] three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325). Upon a third or subsequent conviction, the penalty assessment shall be [five hundred dollars ($500)] five hundred seventy-five dollars ($575). F. Upon a second conviction for transport of a reducible load with a permit for excessive size or weight pursuant to Subsection N of Section 66-7-413 NMSA 1978 more than six miles from a port-of-entry facility on the border with Mexico, the penalty assessment shall be [five hundred dollars ($500)] five hundred seventy-five dollars ($575). Upon a third or subsequent conviction, the penalty assessment shall be [one thousand dollars ($1,000)] one thousand seventy-five dollars ($1,075)." - 12 -